Vermont, session 2025-2026, S165.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 32 V.S.A. § 3622 is added to read:
§ 3622. PARCELS WITH WETLANDS
Parcels with wetlands shall be listed and taxed on the same basis as other
real estate, provided the assessing official accounts for any reduction in value
of the parcel due to development or use restrictions caused by State and
municipal law. As used in this section, “wetlands” means land listed as Class I
wetlands by administrative rule, land mapped as a Class II wetlands on the
Vermont Significant Wetlands Inventory, or land determined by the Secretary
of Natural Resources to be significant wetlands under 10 V.S.A. § 914.
VT LEG #385639 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.165
2026 Page 2 of 2
“Wetlands” includes buffer zones required by the Secretary of Natural
Resources around Class I and II wetlands.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #385639 v.1